New York, session 2025-2026, S6559.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 458-a of the real property tax law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of 4 this subdivision, a county, city, town, village or school district 5 acting by and through its governing body, may grant to a veteran, or the 6 unmarried surviving spouse of such veteran, who served in a combat thea- 7 tre or combat zone of operations, and who is one hundred percent disa- 8 bled as a result of military service, a one hundred percent exemption 9 from real property taxation. The local maximum exemption allowance 10 adopted by a local law pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision 11 shall not apply to such exemptions of one hundred percent disabled 12 veterans. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to assess- 14 ment rolls prepared on and after January 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08816-01-5